apertium-sgw.sgw.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sebat Bet Gurage

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <post>   # Postposition
# <inj>    # Interjection
# <pre>    # Preposition
# <cn>     # Conjunction

# Case 
# <ben>    # Benefactive
# <man>    # Manner
# <all>    # Allative
# <gen>    # Genetive
# <acc>    # Accusative

# Aspects
# <perf>   # Perfect
# <cont>   # Continuous
# <jus>    # Jussive
# <neg>    # Negation


# Types of Verbs
# <conv>   # Converbs
# <eq>   # Equatives

# Prespective 
# <p1>   # 1st Person
# <p2>   # 2nd Person
# <p3>   # 3rd Person

#Gender
# <m>   # Masculine
# <f>   # Feminine

#Other
# <impers>  # Impersonal


# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns
Verbs 
Interjection
Pronoun
Adjective

PATTERN Nouns

Cases?(1) N-Stems [ <n>: ] Possession? Cases?(2) 

LEXICON Possession

<px1sg>:>{ኧ}ና
<px1pl>:>{ኧ}ንዳ
<px2sgm>:>{አ}ሐ
<px2sgf>:>{አ}ሕይ
<px3sgm>:>{ኧ}ታ
<px3sgf>:>{ኧ}ሕይታ
<px2plm>:>{አ}ሑ
<px2plf>:>{አ}ሕማ
<px3plm>:>{አ}ሑና
<px3plf>:>{አ}ሕንማ
<px3m>:>𞟫ት

LEXICON Cases(2)
:የ <gen>:
:የ <acc>:
:የ <ben>:
:በ <loc>:
:የ <man>:
:የ <all>:


PATTERN Verbs

#:V-Aspect(1)? V-JStems [<v>:] V-Suffix? V-PerfectAspect? V-Aspect(2)
(V-Aspect(1) V-Stems [<v>:] V-Aspect(2))[^[Cont,Perf]]

LEXICON V-Aspect(2)
:ን <p1><jus><sg>:
:የ <m><p3><jus><sg>:
:ት <f><p3><jus>:
:ኧ[Cont] <cont><p1><sg>:[Cont]
:ት[Cont] <cont><p2>:[Cont]
:ባነ[Cont] <cont><past>:[Cont]
:[Perf] <perf><p1><sg>:ሑም[Perf]


LEXICON V-Negation (2)
:አ{ት} <neg>:

#{v}> <v><p1><pl>: {v}> #different
#:{v}> <v><m><p3><jus><pl>: {v}>
#:{v}> <v><f><p3><jus><pl>: {v}>

LEXICON V-Suffix
<pl>:ነ

LEXICON V-PerfectAspect
<p1><sg><perf>:ሑም
<m><p2><sg><perf>:ሐ
<f><p2><sg><perf>:𞟥ም
<m><p3><sg><perf>:ም
<f><p3><sg><perf>:ችም
<p1><pl><perf>:ነም
<m><p2><pl><perf>:ሑም
<f><p2><pl><perf>:ሕማም
<m><p3><pl><perf>:ቮም
<f><p3><p1><perf>:ማም
<impers><perf>:ችም


PATTERN Interjection
Interjection-Stem [<intj>:]

PATTERN Pronoun
Pronoun-Stem(1) [<prn>:] Pronoun-Stem(2)

PATTERN Adjective
Adjective-Stem [<adj>:]
###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON N-Stems

ቭራ:ቭራ     
ቤት:ቤት   # "house"
ኧርች:ኧርች   # "boy"
ሰብ:ሰብ
ቕጫ:ቕጫ
እማቴ:እማቴ
ትዛዛሐ:ትዛዛሐ#commandments?
እግዘሮ:እግዘሮ
ን𞟺ስ:ን𞟺ስ
ዳንኤል:ዳንኤል
መንግስት:መንግስት#goverment 
ጠሎት:ጠሎት#prayer
ጐት:ጐት
ተስፋ:ተስፋ#
ቃር:ቃር
ነብስ:ነብስ
ክፍል:ክፍል
የሩሳሌም:የሩሳሌም
መስኮት:መስኮት
ሜና:ሜና #work
ዊነት:ዊነት#grief
እማቴ:እማቴ #people/advisor
ኤያጘኽር:ኤያጘኽር#worthless
ሜዶን:ሜዶን #medes
ፋርስ:ፋርስ#persians
ኤነት:ኤነት#way
አተድሮት:አተድሮት#leaders(pl)
ምራኽር:ምራኽር   #mercifulness
ኼነታኸ:ኼነታኸ #gracefullness
ዳርዮስ:ዳርዮስ #name #darius
አዋጅ:አዋጅ #law


LEXICON Adjective-Stem
ወግ:ወግ#splendid, marvelous
ዝም:ዝም# same


LEXICON V-Stems
ወሮም:ወሮም
በናም:በና[Perf]
በናም:ቨ{ራ}[Cont]
ያሐ:ያሐ
ንበር:ንበር  #live
ᎈረᎃᎌም:ᎈረᎃᎌም
ገፓም:ገፓም
ወጠቅ𞟫ም:ወጠቅ𞟫ም #cling
ኧግዜ:ኧግዜ #help
ይገቤሐማ:ይገቤሐማ # not root but understand  
ሳቢም:ሳቢም #because???
አጫምትሸ:አጫምትሸ #will meditate on?
አትቋምኒ:አትቋምኒ# do? Do this?
ኧረ𞟱:ኧረ𞟱 #put farther away from me (Put far from me)
ደረገና:ደረገና  #do??
አትቋምኒ:አትቋምኒ# don’t know 
ወሮም:ወሮም #said?
ጠበቀም:ጠበቀም #make it stand still/ strudy/ cling on to it’s originality
ኤትሽጋከርም:ኤትሽጋከርም #unchanging 
ፈርም:ፈርም #siggn 
ሐማ:ሐማ #become??
ፍርዳ:ፍርዳ #judge 
ቃሩ:ቃሩ #is/are
ትንሰር𞟺ን:ትንሰር𞟺ን #dread/fear??? Not root word
አትመሬ:አትመሬ #teach me

LEXICON Interjection-Stem
እግዘሮ:እግዘሮ
ሔታ:ሔታ

LEXICON Pronoun-Stem(2)
አሐ:አሐ      <dem>:
ዝሕ:ዝሕ      <dem>:    #this
እያ:እያ      <dem>:


PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
።<sent>:።
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
